New York, session 2025-2026, S8212.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 387 of the laws of 2013, relating to 2 including the trustees of the Freeholders and Commonalty of the town of 3 Southampton, trustees of the Freeholders and Commonalty of the town of 4 East Hampton and the trustees of the Freeholders and Commonalty of the 5 town of Southold as municipal corporations for the purposes of section 6 72-h of the general municipal law, as amended by chapter 160 of the laws 7 of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that section one 9 of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed July 31, [2025] 2027. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13061-01-5